District of Columbia statutes.
22-2707

Procuring; receiving money or other valuable thing for arranging assignation.

(a)

It is unlawful for any person, within the District of Columbia, to receive any money or other valuable thing for or on account of arranging for or causing any individual to engage in prostitution or a sexual act or contact.

(b)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 5 years or by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(2)

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section when the individual so arranged for or caused to engage in prostitution or a sexual act or contact is under the age of 18 years shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 20 years or by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

History

June 25, 1910, 36 Stat. 833, ch. 404, § 3
Jan. 3, 1941, 54 Stat. 1226, ch. 936, § 3
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 12(c), 41 DCR 1639
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 214(c), 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 229(c), 60 DCR 2064

Cross References

Sexual performances using minors, see § 22-3101 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-2707.
1973 Ed., § 22-2707.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-306 rewrote the section, which had previously read as follows: “Any person who, within the District of Columbia, shall receive any money or other valuable thing for or on account of arranging for or causing any individual to have sexual intercourse with any other person or to engage in prostitution, debauchery, or any other immoral act, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than 5 years and a fine of not more than $1,000.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000” in (b)(1), and for “not more than $20,000” in (b)(2).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 229(c) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.